Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 2

County Bounty Act [Repealed]

38-11-201. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, § 1; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.

38-11-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, § 2; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Former title 38, ch. 11, part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.

38-11-203. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, § 3; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Former title 38, ch. 11, part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.

38-11-204. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, § 4; 1996, ch. 675, §§ 20, 21; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Former title 38, ch. 11, part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.

38-11-205. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, §§ 5, 6; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Former title 38, ch. 11, part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.

38-11-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 1035, § 6; 2013, ch. 236, § 67; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 522, § 1, effective March 6, 2020.

Former title 38, ch. 11, part 2, §§ 38-11-201 — 38-11-206 concerned the County Bounty Act.